California statutes. Civil Code
(d) Unless otherwise expressly provided in the electronic record or agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic record is deemed to be sent from the
 sender’s place of business and to be received at the recipient’s place of business or, if the recipient is an individual acting on his or her own behalf, at the recipient’s place of residence. For purposes of this subdivision, the following rules apply:

(1) If the sender or recipient has more than one place of business, the place of business of that person is the place having the closest relationship to the underlying transaction.

(2) If the sender or the recipient does not have a place of business, the place of business is the sender’s or recipient’s residence, as the case may be.

(e) An electronic record is received under subdivision (b) even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

(f) Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information
 processing system described in subdivision (b) establishes that a record was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

(g) If a person is aware that an electronic record purportedly sent under subdivision (a), or purportedly received under subdivision (b), was not actually sent or received, the legal effect of the sending or receipt is determined by other applicable law. Except to the extent permitted by the other law, this subdivision may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.16.

If a law other than this title requires that a notice of the right to cancel be provided or sent, an electronic record may not substitute for a writing under that other law unless, in addition to satisfying the requirements of that other law and this title, the notice of cancellation may be returned by electronic means. This section may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.17.

No state agency, board, or commission may require, prohibit, or regulate the use of an electronic signature in a transaction in which the agency, board, or commission is not a party unless a law other than this title expressly authorizes the requirement, prohibition, or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. INTERPRETATION OF CONTRACTS [1635. - 1663.]

1635.

All contracts, whether public or private, are to be interpreted by the same rules, except as otherwise provided by this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1636.

A contract must be so interpreted as to give effect to the mutual intention of the parties as it existed at the time of contracting, so far as the same is ascertainable and lawful.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1637.

For the purpose of ascertaining the intention of the parties to a contract, if otherwise doubtful, the rules given in this Chapter are to be applied.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.

The language of a contract is to govern its interpretation, if the language is clear and explicit, and does not involve an absurdity.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1639.

When a contract is reduced to writing, the intention of the parties is to be ascertained from the writing alone, if possible; subject, however, to the other provisions of this Title.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.

When, through fraud, mistake, or accident, a written contract fails to express the real intention of the parties, such intention is to be regarded, and the erroneous parts of the writing disregarded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1641.

The whole of a contract is to be taken together, so as to give effect to every part, if reasonably practicable, each clause helping to interpret the other.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1642.

Several contracts relating to the same matters, between the same parties, and made as parts of substantially one transaction, are to be taken together.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1643.

A contract must receive such an interpretation as will make it lawful, operative, definite, reasonable, and capable of being carried into effect, if it can be done without violating the intention of the parties.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1644.

The words of a contract are to be understood in their ordinary and popular sense, rather than according to their strict legal meaning; unless used by the parties in a technical sense, or unless a special meaning is given to them by usage, in which case the latter must be followed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1645.

Technical words are to be interpreted as usually understood by persons in the profession or business to which they relate, unless clearly used in a different sense.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.

A contract is to be interpreted according to the law and usage of the place where it is to be performed; or, if it does not indicate a place of performance, according to the law and usage of the place where it is made.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1646, the parties to any contract, agreement, or undertaking, contingent or otherwise, relating to a transaction involving in the aggregate not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), including a transaction otherwise covered by subdivision (a) of Section 1301 of the Commercial Code, may agree that the law of this state shall govern their rights and duties in whole or in part, whether or not the contract, agreement, or undertaking or transaction bears a reasonable relation to this state. This section does not apply to
 any contract, agreement, or undertaking (a) for labor or personal services, (b) relating to any transaction primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or (c) to the extent provided to the contrary in subdivision (c) of Section 1301 of the Commercial Code.

This section applies to contracts, agreements, and undertakings entered into before, on, or after its effective date; it shall be fully retroactive. Contracts, agreements, and undertakings selecting California law entered into before the effective date of this section shall be valid, enforceable, and effective as if this section had been in effect on the date they were entered into; and actions and proceedings commencing in a court of this state before the effective date of this section may be maintained as if this section were in effect on the date they were commenced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.

A contract may be explained by reference to the circumstances under which it was made, and the matter to which it relates.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1648.

However broad may be the terms of a contract, it extends only to those things concerning which it appears that the parties intended to contract.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1649.

If the terms of a promise are in any respect ambiguous or uncertain, it must be interpreted in the sense in which the promisor believed, at the time of making it, that the promisee understood it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1650.

Particular clauses of a contract are subordinate to its general intent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Where a contract is partly written and partly printed, or where part of it is written or printed under the special directions of the parties, and with a special view to their intention, and the remainder is copied from a form originally prepared without special reference to the particular parties and the particular contract in question, the written parts control the printed parts, and the parts which are purely original control those which are copied from a form. And if the two are absolutely repugnant, the latter must be so far disregarded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1652.

Repugnancy in a contract must be reconciled, if possible, by such an interpretation as will give some effect to the repugnant clauses, subordinate to the general intent and purpose of the whole contract.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.

Words in a contract which are wholly inconsistent with its nature, or with the main intention of the parties, are to be rejected.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1654.

In cases of uncertainty not removed by the preceding rules, the language of a contract should be interpreted most strongly against the party who caused the uncertainty to exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1120, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1655.

Stipulations which are necessary to make a contract reasonable, or conformable to usage, are implied, in respect to matters concerning which the contract manifests no contrary intention.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.

All things that in law or usage are considered as incidental to a contract, or as necessary to carry it into effect, are implied therefrom, unless some of them are expressly mentioned therein, when all other things of the same class are deemed to be excluded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.1.

(a) Whether a retailer may add sales tax reimbursement to the sales price of the tangible personal property sold at retail to a purchaser depends solely upon the terms of the agreement of sale. It shall be presumed that the parties agreed to the addition of sales tax reimbursement to the sales price of tangible personal property sold at retail to a purchaser if:

(1) The agreement of sale expressly provides for such addition of sales tax reimbursement;

(2) Sales tax reimbursement is shown on the sales
 check or other proof of sale; or

(3) The retailer posts in his or her premises in a location visible to purchasers, or includes on a price tag or in an advertisement or other printed material directed to purchasers, a notice to the effect that reimbursement for sales tax will be added to the sales price of all items or certain items, whichever is applicable.

(b) It shall be presumed that the property, the gross receipts from the sale of which is subject to the sales tax, is sold at a price which includes tax reimbursement if the retailer posts in his or her premises, or includes on a price tag or in an advertisement (whichever is applicable) one of the following notices:

(1) “All prices of taxable items include sales tax reimbursement computed to the nearest mill.”

(2) “The price of this item includes sales tax reimbursement computed to the nearest mill.”

(c) (1) The State Board of Equalization shall prepare and make available for inspection and duplication or reproduction a sales tax reimbursement schedule which shall be identical with the following tables up to the amounts specified therein:434 percentPriceTax.01– .10 .00.11– .31 .01.32– .52 .02.53– .73 .03.74– .94 .04.95–1.15 .055 percentPriceTax.01– .09 .00.10– .29 .01.30– .49 .02.50– .69 .03.70– .89 .04.90–1.09 .05514 percentPriceTax.01– .09 .00.10– .28 .01.29– .47 .02.48– .66 .03.67– .85 .04.86–1.04 .05512 percentPriceTax.01– .09 .00.10– .27 .01.28– .45 .02.46– .63 .03.64– .81 .04.82– .99 .05 1.00–1.18 .06534 percentPriceTax.01– .08 .00.09– .26 .01.27– .43 .02.44– .60 .03.61– .78 .04.79– .95 .05.96–1.13 .066 percentPriceTax.01– .08 .00.09– .24 .01.25– .41 .02.42– .58 .03.59– .74 .04.75– .91 .05.92–1.08 .06614 percentPriceTax.01– .07 .00.08– .23 .01.24– .39 .02.40– .55 .03.56– .71 .04.72– .87 .05.88–1.03 .06612 percentPriceTax.01– .07 .00.08– .23 .01.24– .38 .02.39– .53 .03.54– .69 .04.70– .84 .05.85– .99 .06 1.00–1.15 .07634 percentPriceTax.01– .07 .00.08– .22 .01.23– .3 7.02.38– .5 1.03.52– .66 .04.67– .81 .05.82– .96 .06.97–1.11 .077 percentPriceTax.01– .07 .00.08– .21 .01.22– .35 .02.36– .49 .03.50– .64 .04.65– .78 .05.79– .92 .06.93–1.07 .07714 percentPriceTax.01– .06 .00.07– .20 .01.21– .34 .02.35– .48 .03.49– .62 .04.63– .75 .05.76– .89 .06.90–1.03 .07712 percentPriceTax.01– .06 .00.07– .19 .01.20– .33 .02.34– .46 .03.47– .59 .04.60– .73 .05.74– .86 .06.87– .99 .07 1.00–1.13 .08(2) Reimbursement on sales prices in excess of those shown in the schedules may be computed by applying the applicable tax rate to the sales price, rounded off to the nearest cent by eliminating any fraction less than one-half cent and increasing any fraction of one-half cent or over to the next higher cent.

(3) If sales tax reimbursement is added to the sales price of tangible personal property sold at retail, the retailer shall use a schedule provided by the board, or a schedule approved by the board.

(d) The presumptions created by this section are rebuttable presumptions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1528, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.5.

(a) Whether a qualified heavy equipment renter may add estimated personal property tax reimbursement to the rental price of heavy equipment property to a lessee depends solely upon the terms of the rental agreement. It shall be presumed that the parties agreed to the addition of estimated personal property tax reimbursement to the rental price of heavy equipment property to a lessee if all of the following conditions occur:

(1) The rental agreement expressly provides for the addition of estimated personal property tax reimbursement.

(2) Estimated personal property tax reimbursement is separately stated and charged on the rental agreement.

(3) The estimated personal property tax reimbursement amount shall not exceed 0.75 percent of the rental price of the heavy equipment property.

(b) The presumptions created by this section are rebuttable presumptions.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified heavy equipment renter” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 31202 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) “Rental price”
 means the total amount of the charge for renting the heavy equipment property, excluding any separately stated charges that are not rental charges, including, but not limited to, separately stated charges for delivery and pickup fees, damage waivers, environmental mitigation fees, sales tax reimbursement, or use taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 505, Sec. 1.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1657.

If no time is specified for the performance of an act required to be performed, a reasonable time is allowed. If the act is in its nature capable of being done instantly—as, for example, if it consists in the payment of money only—it must be performed immediately upon the thing to be done being exactly ascertained.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1657.1.

Any time specified in a contract of adhesion for the performance of an act required to be performed shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   (SB 762)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1659.

Where all the parties who unite in a promise receive some benefit from the consideration, whether past or present, their promise is presumed to be joint and several.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1660.

A promise, made in the singular number, but executed by several persons, is presumed to be joint and several.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1661.

An executed contract is one, the object of which is fully performed. All others are executory.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1662.

Any contract hereafter made in this State for the purchase and sale of real property shall be interpreted as including an agreement that the parties shall have the following rights and duties, unless the contract expressly provides otherwise:

(a) If, when neither the legal title nor the possession of the subject matter of the contract has been transferred, all or a material part thereof is destroyed without fault of the purchaser or is taken by eminent domain, the vendor cannot enforce the contract, and the purchaser is entitled to recover any portion of the price that he has paid;

(b) If, when either the legal title or the possession of the subject matter of the contract has been transferred, all or any part thereof is destroyed without fault of the vendor or is taken by eminent domain, the purchaser is not thereby relieved from a duty to pay the price, nor is he entitled to recover any portion thereof that he has paid.

This section shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

This section may be cited as the Uniform Vendor and Purchaser Risk Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1663.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Euro” means the currency of participating member states of the European Union that adopt a single currency in accordance with the Treaty on European Union signed February 7, 1992, as amended from time to time.

(2) “Introduction of the euro” includes, but is not limited to, the implementation from time to time of economic and
 monetary union in member states of the European Union in accordance with the Treaty on European Union signed February 7, 1992, as amended from time to time.

(3) “ECU” or “European Currency Unit” means the currency basket that is from time to time used as the unit of account of the European community, as defined in European Council Regulation No. 3320/94.

(b) If a subject or medium of payment of a contract, security, or instrument is the ECU or a currency that has been substituted or replaced by the euro, the euro shall be a commercially reasonable substitute and substantial equivalent that may be either tendered or used in determining the value of the ECU or currency, in each case at the conversion rate specified in, and otherwise calculated in accordance with, the regulations adopted by the Council of the European Union.

(c) The introduction of the euro, the tendering of euros in connection with any obligation in compliance with subdivision (b), the determining of the value of any obligation in compliance with subdivision (b), or the calculating or determining of the subject or medium of payment of a contract, security, or instrument with reference to an interest rate or other basis that has been substituted or replaced due to the introduction of the euro and that is a commercially reasonable substitute and substantial equivalent, shall neither have the effect of discharging or excusing performance under any contract, security, or instrument, nor give a party the right unilaterally to alter or terminate any contract, security, or instrument.

(d) This section shall be subject to any agreements between parties with specific reference to, or agreement regarding, the introduction of the euro.

(e) Notwithstanding the Commercial Code or any other law of this state, this section shall apply to all contracts, securities, and instruments, including contracts with respect to commercial transactions, and shall not be deemed to be displaced by any other law of this state.

(f) In the event of other currency changes, the provisions of this section with respect to the euro shall not be interpreted as creating any negative inference or negative presumption regarding the validity or enforceability of contracts, securities, or instruments denominated in whole or part in those other currencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   Effective June 5, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4. UNLAWFUL CONTRACTS [1667. - 1670.15.]

1667.

That is not lawful which is:

1. Contrary to an express provision of law;

2. Contrary to the policy of express law, though not expressly prohibited; or, 

3. Otherwise contrary to good morals.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1668.

All contracts which have for their object, directly or indirectly, to exempt any one from responsibility for his own fraud, or willful injury to the person or property of another, or violation of law, whether willful or negligent, are against the policy of the law.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1669.

Every contract in restraint of the marriage of any person, other than a minor, is void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

1669.5.

(a) Any contract for the payment of money or other consideration to a minor who has been alleged to be the victim of an unlawful sex act, or to his or her legal representative, by the alleged perpetrator of that unlawful sex act, or his or her legal representative, entered into on or after the time of the alleged unlawful sex act, and providing for any payments to be made more than one year after the date of the execution of the contract, is void as contrary to public policy. A district attorney may bring an action or intervene in any
 action to enjoin enforcement of any contract which is in violation of this section.

(b) This section does not apply after the date of the final judgment in a criminal case against the alleged perpetrator for the unlawful sex act described in subdivision (a).

(c) This section does not apply to a contract for the payment of money or other consideration made from a nonrevocable trust established for the benefit of the minor if the alleged perpetrator has no direct or indirect access to, or control over, the trust.

(d) This section does not apply to an alleged perpetrator of an unlawful sex act against a minor to the extent he or she agrees to pay, or is required by court order to pay, child support for that minor upon a dissolution or legal separation.

(e) For purposes of this section, “unlawful sex act,” means a felony sex offense committed against a minor.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any contract declared void as contrary to public policy under this section may still be enforced by a district attorney against the payor, and the proceeds thereof shall be deposited in the State Children’s Trust Fund pursuant to Section 18969 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 54, Sec. 1.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1669.7.

A contract for the payment of money or other consideration in violation of Section 132.5 of the Penal Code is void as contrary to public policy. The Attorney General or the district attorney of the county in which a violation of Section 132.5 of the Penal Code occurs may bring a civil action, or intervene in any civil action, to enjoin the enforcement of a contract that violates that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 869, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.

Any dispute arising from a construction contract with a public agency, which contract contains a provision that one party to the contract or one party’s agent or employee shall decide any disputes arising under that contract, shall be resolved by submitting the dispute to independent arbitration, if mutually agreeable, otherwise by litigation in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.5.

(a) If the court as a matter of law finds the contract or any clause of the contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made the court may refuse to enforce the contract, or it may enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or it may so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid any unconscionable result.

(b) When it is claimed or appears to the court that the contract or any clause thereof may be unconscionable the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose,
 and effect to aid the court in making the determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.6.

A contract with a consumer located in California for the purchase of a good or service that is made in connection with a telephone solicitation made in or from outside of California and is primarily for personal, family, or household use, is unlawful if, with respect to that telephone solicitation, the telemarketer is in violation of Section 310.4(a)(6)(i) of, or has not complied with Section 310.5(a)(5) of, the Federal Trade Commission’s Telemarketing Sales Rule (16 C.F.R. Part 310), as published in the Federal Register, Volume 68, Number 19, on January 29,
 2003. This section shall apply only to those entities subject to, and does not apply to any transaction exempted under Section 310.6 of, the Telemarketing Sales Rule (16 C.F.R. Part 310), as published in the Federal Register, Volume 68, Number 19, on January 29, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.7.

Any provision of a contract that purports to allow a deduction from a person’s wages for the cost of emigrating and transporting that person to the United States is void as against public policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 35, Sec. 2.   (SB 174)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.8.

(a) (1) A contract or proposed contract for the sale or lease of consumer goods or services may not include a provision waiving the consumer’s right to make any statement regarding the seller or lessor or its employees or agents, or concerning the goods or services.

(2) It shall be unlawful to threaten or to seek to enforce a provision made unlawful under this section, or to
 otherwise penalize a consumer for making any statement protected under this section.

(b) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation, and five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the second and for each subsequent violation, to be assessed and collected in a civil action brought by the consumer, by the Attorney General, or by the district attorney or city attorney of the county or city in which the violation occurred. When collected, the civil penalty shall be payable, as appropriate, to the consumer or to the general fund of whichever governmental entity brought the action to assess the civil penalty.

(d) In addition, for a willful, intentional, or reckless violation of this section, a consumer or public prosecutor may recover a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(e) The penalty provided by this section is not an exclusive remedy, and does not affect any other relief or remedy provided by law. This section shall not be construed to prohibit or limit a person or business that hosts online consumer reviews or comments from removing a statement that is otherwise lawful to remove.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   (AB 2365)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.8.5.

(a) A contract or proposed contract for the provision of a consumer service by a licensee regulated by a licensing board shall not include a provision limiting the consumer’s ability to file a complaint with that board or to participate in the board’s investigation into the licensee.

(b) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Consumer service” means any service that is obtained for use primarily for personal, family,
 or household purposes.

(2) “Licensing board” means any entity described in Section 101 of the Business and Professions Code, the State Bar of California, the Department of Real Estate, or any other state agency that issues a license, certificate, or registration authorizing a person to engage in a business or profession.

(d) Violation of this section by a licensee shall constitute unprofessional conduct subject to discipline by the licensee’s licensing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 98.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.9.

(a) A city, county, city and county, or local law enforcement agency that does not, as of January 1, 2018, have a contract with the federal government or any federal agency or a private corporation to house or detain noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration custody, shall not, on and after January 1, 2018, enter into a contract with the federal government or any federal agency or a private corporation, to house or detain in a locked detention facility noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration custody.

(b) A city, county, city and county, or local law enforcement agency that, as of January 1, 2018, has an existing contract with the federal government or any federal agency
 or a private corporation to detain noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration
 custody, shall not, on and after January 1, 2018, renew or modify that contract in a manner that would expand the maximum number of contract beds that may be utilized to house or detain in a locked detention facility noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration custody.

(c) Any facility that detains a noncitizen pursuant to a contract with a city, county, city and county, or a local law enforcement agency is subject to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) A city, county, city and county, or public agency shall not, on and after January 1, 2018, approve or sign a deed, instrument, or other document related to a conveyance of land or issue a permit for the building or reuse of existing
 buildings by any private corporation, contractor, or vendor to house or detain noncitizens for purposes of civil immigration proceedings unless the city, county, city and county, or public agency has done both of the following:

(1) Provided notice to the public of the proposed conveyance or permitting action at least 180 days before execution of the conveyance or permit.

(2) Solicited and heard public comments on the proposed conveyance or permit action in at least two separate meetings open to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 42.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.10.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a contract entered into on or after January 1, 2018, to transfer ownership of a dog or cat in which ownership is contingent upon the making of payments over a period of time subsequent to the transfer of possession of the dog or cat is void as against public policy.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to payments to repay an unsecured loan for the
 purchase of the dog or cat.

(b) A contract entered into on or after January 1, 2018, for the lease of a dog or cat that provides for or offers the option of transferring ownership of the dog or cat at the end of the lease term is void as against public policy.

(c) In addition to any other remedies provided by law, the consumer taking possession of a dog or cat transferred under a contract described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or in subdivision (b) shall be deemed the owner of the dog or cat and shall also be entitled to the return of all amounts the consumer paid under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   (AB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.11.

Notwithstanding any other law, a provision in a contract or settlement agreement entered into on or after January 1, 2019, that waives a party’s right to testify in an administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding concerning alleged criminal conduct or alleged sexual harassment on the part of the other party to the contract or settlement agreement, or on the part of the agents or employees of the other party, when the party has been required or requested to attend the proceeding pursuant to a court order, subpoena, or written request from an administrative agency or the Legislature, is void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 25.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.12.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Exclusive listing agreement” means any contract or agreement providing an exclusive right to list or sell residential real property, including:

(A) An exclusive agreement as described in Section 10018.15 or 10018.16 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) A contract or agreement to enter into any such agreement or arrangement.

(2) “Single-family residential property” means one of the following:

(A) Real property
 improved with one to four dwelling units.

(B) A unit in a residential stock cooperative, condominium, or planned unit development.

(C) A mobilehome or manufactured home when offered for sale or sold through a real estate licensee pursuant to Section 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code.

(D) A qualified ownership interest in real property subject to an agreement providing the owner the right to occupy one to four dwelling units on that property.

(b) (1) It is unlawful for an exclusive listing agreement regarding single-family residential property to last longer than 24 months from the date the agreement was made. This paragraph shall not apply to exclusive listing agreements entered into between a real estate broker and a
 corporation, limited liability company, or partnership.

(2) No exclusive listing agreement shall renew automatically, and any renewal of an exclusive listing agreement shall be in writing and be dated and signed by all parties to the agreement. It is unlawful for a renewal of an exclusive listing agreement subject to paragraph (1) to last longer than 12 months from the date the renewal was made.

(c) It is unlawful to present for recording or filing, or otherwise attempt to record or file, with a county recorder an exclusive listing agreement of any duration or any memoranda or notice of such an agreement.

(d) It is unlawful to enforce or attempt to enforce an exclusive listing agreement that is made, or that is presented for recording or filing with a county recorder, in violation of this section.

(e) (1) An exclusive listing agreement that is made, or that is presented for recording or filing with a county recorder, in violation of this section is void and unenforceable. A homeowner who entered into any such agreement may retain any consideration received thereunder.

(2) A violation of this section constitutes a violation under Section 1770.

(3) Any person licensed pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code who violates any provision of this section shall be deemed to have violated that person’s licensing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   (AB 1345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.15.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Consumer” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 302 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Consumer use agreement” means a contract between a person and a consumer that the consumer enters into in order to use, receive, or otherwise enjoy a good, service, money, or credit.

(3) “Person” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 302 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) Dispute resolution terms and conditions of a consumer use agreement shall be limited to the use, payment, or provision of the good, service, money, or credit provided by that consumer use agreement.

(c) A waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and void and unenforceable.

(d) This section shall be liberally construed for the purpose of protecting consumers.

(e) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with duties or obligations imposed under any other law, shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under any other law, and do not limit any rights or remedies under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (SB 82)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4.1. Buyer-Broker Representation Agreements [1670.50. - 1670.50.]

1670.50.

(a) A buyer-broker representation agreement shall be executed between a buyer’s agent and a buyer as soon as practicable, but no later than the execution of the buyer’s offer to purchase real property.

(b) The buyer-broker representation agreement shall include, but not be limited to, terms related to all of the following:

(1) Compensation of the real estate broker.

(2) Services to be rendered.

(3) When compensation is due.

(4) Contract termination.

(c) Prior to execution of a buyer-broker representation agreement between the buyer and the buyers’s agent, the buyer’s agent shall provide the disclosure form required by Section 2079.14 to the buyer.

(d) (1) A buyer-broker representation agreement shall not last longer than three months from the date the agreement was made. This paragraph shall not apply to a buyer-broker representation agreement entered into between a real estate broker and a corporation, limited liability company, or partnership.

(2) A buyer-broker representation agreement shall not renew automatically, and a renewal of a buyer-broker representation agreement shall be in writing and be dated and signed by all parties to the agreement. A renewal of a buyer-broker representation agreement subject to paragraph (1) shall not last
 longer than three months from the date the renewal was made.

(3) A buyer-broker representation agreement that is made in violation of this subdivision is void and unenforceable.

(e) A person licensed pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Business and Professions Code who violates this section shall be deemed to have violated that person’s licensing law.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “buyer-broker representation agreement” means the same as it is defined in subdivision (p) of Section 2079.13.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (AB 2992)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4.5. LIQUIDATED DAMAGES [1671. - 1681.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1671. - 1671.]

1671.
